Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1791
Loan limit.

The aggregate of loans to any one member shall be limited to ten percent of a credit union's share accounts, undivided earnings, and reserves. This limit shall not apply to loans which are fully secured by assignment of share accounts in the credit union.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 91.